Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2627.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 3 of the General Laws entitled "ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 7.1
TEMPORARY EXTENDED SERVICE HOURS
3-7.1-1. Authorization of temporary extended service hours.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, any person or
establishment possessing the qualifications and meeting the requirements of this title that is licensed
to sell intoxicating liquor by the drink at retail for consumption on premises in any city or town in
this state may, for the periods authorized in § 3-7.1-2, apply to their licensing authority at least
fourteen (14) days in advance to:
(1) Operate beyond its normal closing time and until up to four o’clock (4:00) a.m.; and
(2) To sell, serve and allow for the consumption of alcoholic beverages beyond its normal
cut off time and until up to three o’clock (3:00) a.m.
(b) This temporary extension of service hours shall apply only to indoor areas at licensed
establishments, and shall not be applicable to any special permits issued by a licensing authority
unless explicitly granted by that body.
(c) The provisions of this title relating to hours of operation, time of closing or opening, or
hours of sale of intoxicating liquor by the drink at retail for consumption on the premises shall not

apply to such licenses approved for any temporary extension period, except as provided in § 3-7.1-
3.
3-7.1-2. Periods authorized for temporary extension of service hours.
The provisions of this chapter are authorized only for the dates enumerated herein and for
the express purpose of offering public watch opportunities for 2026 FIFA World Cup Tournament
matches beginning on any of the following dates and continuing through the authorized period
granted by the local licensing authority in the morning of the succeeding day in calendar year 2026:
June 11, 13, 14, 16, 17, 19, 20, 22, 23, 25, 26, and 27; July 2, and 3.
3-7.1-3. Municipal authorization-Procedures.
(a) A licensing authority may authorize or reject in full or in part for any reason an
application by a licensee for the extended operation and service hours or areas provided under this
chapter within their jurisdiction.
(b) Licensees shall not be required to submit any application fee for the purposes of the
temporary extensions granted under this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005018/SUB A/2
========
LC005018/SUB A/2 - Page 2 of 3